italian.aff
# indicativo, congiuntivo, condizionale, imperativo
flag *E:

    # flag *E:
    # andare
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,vado   # ind.  pres. 1a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,vai    # ind.  pres. 2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,va     # ind.  pres. 3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,iamo      # ind.  pres. 1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,te         # ind.  pres. 2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,vanno  # ind.  pres. 3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,vo         # ind.  imp.  1a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,vi         # ind.  imp.  2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,va         # ind.  imp.  3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,vamo       # ind.  imp.  1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,vate       # ind.  imp.  2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,vano       # ind.  imp.  3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,i          # ind.  pass. 1a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,sti        # ind.  pass. 2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,ò         # ind.  pass. 3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,mmo        # ind.  pass. 1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,ste        # ind.  pass. 2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -e,ono         # ind.  pass. 3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rò        # ind.  fut.  1a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rai       # ind.  fut.  2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rà        # ind.  fut.  3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,remo      # ind.  fut.  1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rete      # ind.  fut.  2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,ranno     # ind.  fut.  3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,vada   # cong. pres. 1a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -andare,vada # cong. pres. 2a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -andare,vada # cong. pres. 3a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -are,iamo    # cong. pres. 1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,iate      # cong. pres. 2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -andare,vadano # cong. pres. 3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,ssi        # cong. pass. 1a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -re,ssi      # cong. pass. 2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,sse        # cong. pass. 3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,ssimo      # cong. pass. 1a p. pl.
#     a n d a r e     >    -re,ste      # cong. pass. 2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -re,ssero      # cong. pass. 3a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rei       # cond. 1a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,resti     # cond. 2a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rebbe     # cond. 3a p. sn.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,remmo     # cond. 1a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,reste     # cond. 2a p. pl.
    a n d a r e     >    -are,rebbero   # cond. 3a p. pl.
#     a n d a r e     >    -andare,vai  # imp. 2a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -andare,vada # imp. 3a p. sn.
#     a n d a r e     >    -are,iamo    # imp. 1a p. pl.
#     a n d a r e     >    -re,te       # imp. 2a p. pl.
#     a n d a r e     >    -andare,vadano # imp. 3a p. pl.

    # flag *E:
    # riempire
    p i r e         >    -re,o          # ind.  pres. 1a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,
    p i r e         >    -re,e          # ind.  pres. 3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,amo        # ind.  pres. 1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,te         # ind.  pres. 2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ono        # ind.  pres. 3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,vo         # ind.  imp.  1a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,vi         # ind.  imp.  2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,va         # ind.  imp.  3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,vamo       # ind.  imp.  1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,vate       # ind.  imp.  2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,vano       # ind.  imp.  3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,i          # ind.  pass. 1a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,sti        # ind.  pass. 2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -ire,ì         # ind.  pass. 3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,mmo        # ind.  pass. 1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ste        # ind.  pass. 2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -e,ono         # ind.  pass. 3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -e,ò           # ind.  fut.  1a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -e,ai          # ind.  fut.  2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -e,à           # ind.  fut.  3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    mo             # ind.  fut.  1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    te             # ind.  fut.  2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -e,anno        # ind.  fut.  3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,a          # cong. pres. 1a p. sn.
#     p i r e         >    -re,a        # cong. pres. 2a p. sn.
#     p i r e         >    -re,a        # cong. pres. 3a p. sn.
#     p i r e         >    -re,amo      # cong. pres. 1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ate        # cong. pres. 2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ano        # cong. pres. 3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ssi        # cong. pass. 1a p. sn.
#     p i r e         >    -re,ssi      # cong. pass. 2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,sse        # cong. pass. 3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -re,ssimo      # cong. pass. 1a p. pl.
#     p i r e         >    -re,ste      # cong. pass. 2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    -re,ssero      # cong. pass. 3a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    i              # cond. 1a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    sti            # cond. 2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    bbe            # cond. 3a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    mmo            # cond. 1a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    ste            # cond. 2a p. pl.
    p i r e         >    bbero          # cond. 3a p. pl.
#     p i r e         >    -re,         # imp. 2a p. sn.
    p i r e         >    -ire,a         # imp. 3a p. sn.
#     p i r e         >    -re,amo      # imp. 1a p. pl.
#     p i r e         >    -re,te       # imp. 2a p. pl.
#     p i r e         >    -re,ano      # imp. 3a p. pl.

    # flag *E:
    # godere
    o d e r e       >    -ere,o         # ind.  pres. 1a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,i         # ind.  pres. 2a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,
    o d e r e       >    -ere,iamo      # ind.  pres. 1a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,te         # ind.  pres. 2a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,ono       # ind.  pres. 3a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,vo         # ind.  imp.  1a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,vi         # ind.  imp.  2a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,va         # ind.  imp.  3a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,vamo       # ind.  imp.  1a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,vate       # ind.  imp.  2a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,vano       # ind.  imp.  3a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,tti        # ind.  pass. 1a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,sti        # ind.  pass. 2a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,tte        # ind.  pass. 3a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -re,mmo        # ind.  pass. 1a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,ste        # ind.  pass. 2a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,ttero      # ind.  pass. 3a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,rò        # ind.  fut.  1a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,rai       # ind.  fut.  2a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,rà        # ind.  fut.  3a p. sn.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,remo      # ind.  fut.  1a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,rete      # ind.  fut.  2a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,ranno     # ind.  fut.  3a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,a         # cong. pres. 1a p. sn.
#     o d e r e       >    -ere,a       # cong. pres. 2a p. sn.
#     o d e r e       >    -ere,a       # cong. pres. 3a p. sn.
#     o d e r e       >    -ere,iamo    # cong. pres. 1a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,iate      # cong. pres. 2a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -ere,ano       # cong. pres. 3a p. pl.
    o d e r e       >    -re,ssi        # cong. pass. 1a p. sn.
