italian.dict
accadere/ABEGKOSVY1
accendere/ABEGKOUXY1z
accogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
accondiscendere/ABEGKOUXY1
addivenire/ABEILPTWY1
andare/ABEIKOSVY1z
apparire/ABEIKOTWY1z
appendere/ABEGKOUXY1
apprendere/ABEGKOUXY1
arrendere/ABEGKOUXY1
assalire/ABEILPSVY1
attendere/ABEGKOUXY1z
avvedere/ABEGKOSVY1
avvenire/ABEILPTWY1
benedire/ABEIMQTWZ2zyx
cadere/ABEGKOSVY1
circonvenire/ABEILPTWY1
cogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
comparire/ABEIKOTWY1z
comprendere/ABEGKOUXY1z
concedere/ABEGKOUXY1
condiscendere/ABEGKOUXY1
contraddire/ABEIMQTWZ2zyx
contravvenire/ABEILPTWY1
convenire/ABEILPTWY1
corrispondere/ABEGKOUXY1
decadere/ABEGKOSVY1
defungere/ABEGKOSVY1
difendere/ABEGKOUXY1
dipendere/ABEGKOUXY1
dire/ABEIMQTWZ2zx
discendere/ABEGKOUXY1
disdire/ABEIMQTWZ2zyx
divenire/ABEILPTWY1
estendere/ABEGKOUXY1
fendere/ABEGKOY1
fungere/ABEGKOSVY1
godere/ABEGKOSVY1
incogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
indire/ABEIMQTWZ2yx
inferire/ABEGKOTWY1
interdire/ABEIMQTWZ2yx
intervenire/ABEILPTWY1
intraprendere/ABEGKOUXY1
intravedere/ABEGKOSUVXY1
maledire/ABEIMQTWYZ12zyx
morire/ABEIKOTWY1z
nascondere/ABEGKOUXY1
offendere/ABEGKOUXY1
pendere/ABEGKOSUVXY1
pervenire/ABEILPTWY1
possedere/ABEHKOSVY1
predire/ABEIMQTWZ2
premorire/ABEIKOTWY1
prendere/ABEGKOUXY1
prescindere/ABEGKOUXY1
prevenire/ABEILPTWY1
protendere/ABEGKOUXY1
provenire/ABEILPTWY1
raccogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
rendere/ABEGKOUXY1
rescindere/ABEGKOUXY1
riaccadere/ABEGKOSVY1
riaccogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
riappendere/ABEGKOUXY1
riassalire/ABEILPSVY1
ricadere/ABEGKOSVY1
ricogliere/ABEGKOTWY1
riconcedere/ABEGKOUXY1
riconvenire/ABEILPTWY1
ridiscendere/ABEGKOUXY1
ridivenire/ABEILPTWY1
riempire/ABEILPSVY013
rimpossessando/E
rinvenire/ABEILPTWY1
riprendere/ABEGKOUXY1
risalire/ABEILPSVY1
risedere/ABEHKOSVY1
rispondere/ABEGKOUXY1
risvenire/ABEILPTWY1
rivedere/ABEGKOSUVXY1
rivenire/ABEILPTWY1
salire/ABEILPSVY1
scadere/ABEGKOSVY1
scendere/ABEGKOUXY1z
scindere/ABEGKOUXY1
scomparire/ABEIKOTWY1
scoscendere/ABEGKOUXY1
sedere/1ABEHKOSVYa
soprassedere/ABEHKOSVY1
sopravvenire/ABEILPTWY1
sorprendere/ABEGKOUXY1
sospendere/ABEGKOUXY1
sovvenire/ABEILPTWY1z
spendere/ABEGKOUXY1
stendere/ABEGKOUXY1z
strabenedire/ABEIMQTWZ2
stramaledire/ABEIMQTWZ2
stravedere/ABEGKOUXY1
succedere/ABEGKOSUVXY1
svenire/ABEILPTWY1
tendere/ABEGKOUXY1
trasalire/ABEILPSVY1
trascendere/ABEGKOUXY1
trasparire/ABEIKOSTVWY1
vedere/ABEGKOSUVXY1
venire/ABEILPTWY1
vilipendere/ABEGKOUXY1
